New Mexico, session 2026, HB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 7-2-5.13 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2022, Chapter 47, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read: "7-2-5.13. EXEMPTION--ARMED FORCES RETIREMENT PAY.-- A. An individual who is an armed forces retiree or the surviving spouse of an armed forces retiree may claim an exemption in [an amount equal to thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) of] the amount of the retiree's armed forces retirement pay includable, except for this exemption, in net income. B. As used in this section, "armed forces retiree" means a former member of the armed forces of the United States who has qualified by years of service or disability to separate from military service with lifetime benefits." SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. - 2 -